Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3860.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 15A.082, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Submission of recommendations and determination. (a) By September 1 in each even-numbered year, the Compensation Council shall submit to the speaker of the house and the president of the senate salary recommendations for justices of the supreme court, and judges of the court of appeals and district court. The recommended salaries take effect on July 1 of the next year and July 1 of the subsequent even-numbered year, unless the legislature by law provides otherwise. The salary recommendations take effect if an appropriation of money to pay the recommended salaries is enacted after the recommendations are submitted and before their effective date. Recommendations may be expressly modified or rejected. (b) By deleted text begin Aprildeleted text end new text begin Maynew text end 1 in each odd-numbered year, the Compensation Council must prescribe salaries for constitutional officers, and for the agency and metropolitan agency heads identified in section 15A.0815. The prescribed salary for each office must take effect July 1 of that year and July 1 of the subsequent even-numbered year and at whatever interval the council determines thereafter, unless the legislature by law provides otherwise. An appropriation by the legislature to fund the relevant office, branch, or agency of an amount sufficient to pay the salaries prescribed by the council constitutes a prescription by law as provided in the Minnesota Constitution, article V, sections 4 and 5. (c) By April 1 in each odd-numbered year, the Compensation Council must prescribe daily compensation for voting members of the Direct Care and Treatment executive board. The recommended daily compensation takes effect on July 1 of that year and July 1 of the subsequent even-numbered year and at whatever interval the council recommends thereafter, unless the legislature by law provides otherwise.